New York, session 2025-2026, A216.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0123 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0123. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances removal treat- 4 ment installation grant program. 5 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, "perfluoroalkyl and 6 polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" shall have the same meaning as in 7 section 27-3301 of this chapter. 8 2. Grant program. The department, within amounts from any source 9 appropriated or otherwise provided for such purpose, shall establish a 10 perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances removal treatment instal- 11 lation grant program. The department shall provide a one-time grant to 12 private well users for up to five thousand dollars for the installation 13 of PFAS treatment, or up to ten thousand dollars for a service 14 connection to a public water system. 15 3. Eligibility. (a) The following persons shall be eligible to apply 16 for such grant program: 17 (i) owners of a single or multiple-unit residential property; and 18 (ii) tenants or occupants of a residential property where the owner of 19 such property has not applied for the grant for such property. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01014-01-5 A. 216 2 1 (b) Installers of such treatments may apply for such grant on behalf 2 of an eligible applicant, provided there is a waiver of claims between 3 such parties. 4 (c) An applicant shall not be eligible to apply for such grant program 5 if such applicant has an offer of an alternate water source from a third 6 party, including bottled water, treatment, or service connection. 7 4. Application. (a) Applicants shall submit an application to the 8 department in a manner and form to be determined by the commissioner, 9 and shall include the following documentation: 10 (i) analytical results from a laboratory certified to test for PFAS by 11 the department of health environmental laboratory approval program. Such 12 results must show a PFAS result greater than the maximum contaminant 13 level or other drinking water cleanup standard set for PFAS by the 14 department of health or the United States environmental protection agen- 15 cy; 16 (ii) an estimate for the cost of treatment installation or service 17 connection; and 18 (iii) specification sheets for treatment and equipment to be 19 installed, if applicable and available. 20 (b) Grants awarded pursuant to this section shall be used solely for 21 the purpose of purchasing and installing PFAS treatment equipment. 22 (c) The commissioner, upon review of an applicant's application, shall 23 determine if such applicant is eligible for a grant pursuant to this 24 section. 25 5. Public awareness. The department shall publish information about 26 the grant program on the department's website and create public educa- 27 tion materials to publicize the grant program and distribute these mate- 28 rials to local governments, community organizations, and other relevant 29 institutions. The department shall also compile and distribute a list of 30 vendors that offer treatment technology or service connection to a 31 public water system for residents of this state, provided that such a 32 list does not imply an endorsement of the vendors by the department. 33 § 2. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a new 34 section 37-0125 to read as follows: 35 § 37-0125. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances removal treat- 36 ment maintenance rebate program. 37 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, "perfluoroalkyl and 38 polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" shall have the same meaning as in 39 section 27-3301 of this chapter. 40 2. Rebate program. The department, within amounts from any source 41 appropriated or otherwise provided for such purpose, shall establish a 42 perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances removal treatment mainte- 43 nance rebate program. The department shall provide a rebate for the 44 maintenance of PFAS treatment equipment installed by private well users. 45 3. Eligibility. The following persons shall be eligible to apply for 46 such rebate program: 47 (a) owners of a single or multiple-unit residential property where 48 PFAS treatment is installed; and 49 (b) tenants or occupants of a residential property where PFAS treat- 50 ment is installed. 51 4. Application. (a) Applicants shall submit an application to the 52 department in a manner and form to be determined by the commissioner, 53 and shall include the following documentation: 54 (i) specification sheets for treatment and equipment installed, if 55 applicable and available; A. 216 3 1 (ii) photo documentation of the treatment installation of service 2 connection; and 3 (iii) post-treatment analytical results from a laboratory certified to 4 test for PFAS by the department of health environmental laboratory 5 approval program. Such results must show PFAS concentrations below the 6 maximum contaminant level or other drinking water cleanup standard set 7 for PFAS, if applicable. 8 (b) The commissioner, upon review of an applicant's application, shall 9 determine if such applicant is eligible for a rebate pursuant to this 10 section. The commissioner shall make the determination as to the amount 11 of rebate approved, provided that such amount shall in no event exceed 12 one thousand five hundred dollars. 13 (c) The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations regarding 14 how often an applicant may submit an application pursuant to this subdi- 15 vision. 16 5. Public awareness. The department shall publish information about 17 the rebate program on the department's website and create public educa- 18 tion materials to publicize the rebate program and distribute these 19 materials to local governments, community organizations, and other rele- 20 vant institutions. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.